Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1140.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Contraceptive Access for All Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agreement with the Department of Human Services." An agreement between an MA or CHIP managed care plan and the Department of Human Services to manage the purchase and provision of services."Cost sharing." As follows:1234567891011121314151617 (1) The share of the health care costs covered by an MA or CHIP managed care plan or a health insurance policy that an enrollee or covered person pays out of pocket.(2) The term includes a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar charge.(3) The term does not include a premium, a balance billed amount from an out-of-network provider or the cost of a noncovered service."Covered person." A policyholder, subscriber, covered person or other individual who is entitled to receive health care services under a health insurance policy."Department." The Insurance Department of the Commonwealth."Enrollee." An individual who is entitled to receive health care services under an agreement with the Department of Human Services."FDA." The United States Food and Drug Administration."Health care provider." An individual who is authorized to practice some component of the healing arts by a license, permit, certificate or registration issued by a Commonwealth licensing agency or board."Health insurance policy." As follows:(1) A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by a health insurer that provides medical or health care coverage.(2) The term does not include any of the following:(i) An accident only policy.(ii) A credit only policy.(iii) A long-term care policy.(iv) A disability income policy.(v) A specified disease policy.20250HB1140PN1449 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) A Medicare supplement policy.(vii) A fixed indemnity policy.(viii) A dental only policy.(ix) A vision only policy.(x) A workers' compensation policy.(xi) An automobile medical payment policy.(xii) A policy under which benefits are provided by the Federal Government to active or former military personnel and their dependents.(xiii) A hospital indemnity policy.(xiv) Any other similar policy providing for limited benefits."Health insurer." An entity licensed by the department that offers, issues or renews an individual or group health insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:(1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV thereof.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations)."Medical Assistance or CHIP managed care plan" or "MA or CHIP managed care plan." A health care plan that uses a gatekeeper to manage the utilization of health care services by medical assistance or children's health insurance program enrollees and integrates the financing and delivery of health care services."Out-of-network provider." A health care provider who does not contract with an MA or CHIP managed care plan or a health 20250HB1140PN1449 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 insurer to provide health care services to an enrollee or covered person."Prior authorization." As defined in section 2102 of The Insurance Company Law of 1921."Step therapy." As defined in section 2102 of The Insurance Company Law of 1921.Section 3. Minimum coverage requirements.(a) Mandatory coverage.--(1) Except as provided in section 5 and subject to subsection (e), an MA or CHIP managed care plan or health insurance policy offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth shall provide coverage for all of the following:(i) Any of the following for which an enrollee or covered person obtained a prescription:(A) An FDA-approved contraceptive drug.(B) An FDA-approved, cleared or granted contraceptive device or other product.(ii) All FDA-approved over-the-counter emergency contraceptive drugs, including levonorgestrel and ulipristal acetate, for which an enrollee or covered person obtained a prescription or which is the subject of a standing order issued under section 4. Coverage provided under this subparagraph shall not be subject to prior authorization or step therapy.(iii) All FDA-approved over-the-counter oral contraceptive drugs, for which an enrollee or covered person obtained a prescription or which is the subject of a standing order issued under section 4. Coverage provided under this subparagraph shall not be subject to prior authorization or step therapy.20250HB1140PN1449 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) FDA-approved prescription oral contraceptives intended to last for not more than a three-month period for the first time that the prescription oral contraceptive drug is dispensed to the enrollee or covered person.(v) (A) Subject to clause (B), FDA-approved prescription oral contraceptive drugs intended to last for not more than a 12-month period for any refill or subsequent dispensing of the prescription oral contraceptive drug initially prescribed under subparagraph (i) or (iv). Prescription oral contraceptive drugs provided under this subparagraph may be dispensed all at once or over the course of the 12-month period, regardless of whether the enrollee or covered person was enrolled in an MA or CHIP managed care plan or health insurance policy at the time the prescription oral contraceptive drug was first dispensed.(B) An enrollee or covered person may not fill more than one 12-month prescription oral contraceptive drug in a single calendar year.(vi) Voluntary adult male and voluntary adult female sterilization surgery.(vii) Items and services integral to the furnishing of contraceptive drugs, devices and products or voluntary sterilization surgery, including patient screening, education and counseling and items and services related to the evaluation, insertion or removal of a contraceptive device or continuance or discontinuance of a contraceptive drug, device or other product.20250HB1140PN1449 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to:(i) Require coverage of male condoms.(ii) Exclude, limit or prohibit coverage for contraceptive drugs, devices and products used for other than contraceptive purposes.(b) Cost sharing prohibited.--Except as provided in subsection (e)(1)(i)(B), coverage under subsection (a) shall be provided without imposing any form of cost sharing.(c) Conditions for coverage.--Except for over-the-counter emergency contraceptive drugs described in subsection (a)(1)(ii) and over-the-counter oral contraceptive drugs described in subsection (a)(1)(iii), an MA or CHIP managed care plan or health insurance policy may require that items and services described in subsection (a) are medically necessary or appropriate as a condition of coverage.(d) Compliance with law.--An MA or CHIP managed care plan or health insurer that imposes prior authorization or step therapy on the items or services described in subsection (c) shall comply with all applicable Federal and State laws and guidance concerning prior authorization and step therapy, including:(1) Section 2155 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(2) Section 2156 of The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(3) Subdivision (i) of Article XXI of The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(4) Subdivision (i.1) of Article XXI of The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(e) Out-of-network providers.--(1) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii), nothing in subsection (a) shall:20250HB1140PN1449 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Require a health insurer that has a network of providers to provide benefits for contraceptive care covered under subsection (a) that are delivered by an out-of-network provider.(B) Preclude a health insurer that has a network of providers from imposing cost-sharing requirements for contraceptive care covered under subsection (a) that are delivered by an out-of-network provider.(ii) If a health insurer does not have in its network a provider that can provide contraceptive care covered under subsection (a), the health insurer shall cover the contraceptive care when performed by an out-of-network provider and may not impose cost sharing with respect to the contraceptive care.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting an enrollee's ability to receive contraceptive care from a health care provider in accordance with 42 CFR 431.51 (relating to free choice of providers).Section 4. Standing order.(a) Permissible acts.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a health care provider otherwise authorized to prescribe FDA-approved over-the-counter emergency contraceptive drugs or FDA-approved over-the-counter oral contraceptive drugs may dispense, prescribe or distribute the drugs directly or by a standing order to a person within this Commonwealth.(b) Issuance of standing order.--The Secretary of Health or the Physician General of the Commonwealth shall issue a Statewide standing order in accordance with subsection (a) for FDA-approved over-the-counter emergency contraceptive drugs and FDA-approved over-the-counter oral contraceptive drugs.20250HB1140PN1449 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Liability.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2), a health care provider who, acting in good faith, prescribes or dispenses a drug pursuant to a standing order under this section shall not be subject to any criminal or civil liability or any professional disciplinary action for:(i) prescribing or dispensing the drug; or(ii) any outcomes resulting from the eventual administration of the FDA-approved over-the-counter emergency contraceptive drug or FDA-approved over-the-counter oral contraceptive drug.(2) The immunity under paragraph (1) shall not apply to a health care provider who acts with intent to harm or with reckless indifference to a substantial risk of harm.Section 5. Religious or moral exemption.(a) General rule.--Notwithstanding the act of December 9, 2002 (P.L.1701, No.214), known as the Religious Freedom Protection Act, and except as provided in subsection (b), a health insurance policy issued to an entity or individual that objects to coverage or payments for contraceptive services under 45 CFR 147.132 (relating to religious exemptions in connection with coverage of certain preventive health services) or 147.133 (relating to moral exemptions in connection with coverage of certain preventive health services) is exempt from section 3.(b) Exception.--An exemption under subsection (a) shall not apply to contraceptive drugs, devices or products used for purposes other than contraceptive purposes.(c) Notice.--An objecting entity exempt from section 3 shall provide written notice to employees and prospective employees that health insurance coverage maintained by the entity limits 20250HB1140PN1449 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or does not provide coverage of contraceptive care described in section 3(a). The notice shall indicate whether any contraceptive care is covered and, if so, under what conditions.Section 6. Confidentiality.(a) Alternative means of communication.--An MA or CHIP managed care plan or health insurer must permit and accommodate a reasonable request by an enrollee or covered person to receive communications from the MA or CHIP managed care plan or health insurer regarding the receipt of contraceptive care covered under section 3 by alternative means or at alternative locations. A request is reasonable if the enrollee or covered person states clearly that the disclosure of all or part of that information could endanger the enrollee or covered person.(b) Request in writing.--An MA or CHIP managed care plan or health insurer may require the enrollee or covered person to make a request for confidential communication described in subsection (a) in writing.(c) Condition.--An MA or CHIP managed care plan or health insurer may condition the provision of a reasonable accommodation on specification of an alternative address or other method of contact.(d) Required statement.--An MA or CHIP managed care plan or health insurer may require that a request for alternative communication under subsection (a) contain a statement that disclosure of all or part of the information to which the request pertains could endanger the enrollee or covered person.(e) Denials and requests for additional information.--If an MA or CHIP managed care plan or health insurer denies or requests additional information from the covered person or enrollee regarding a request for confidential communications, 20250HB1140PN1449 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the MA or CHIP managed care plan or health insurer shall transmit the denial or request to the covered person or enrollee in accordance with the alternative means or alternative locations selected by the covered person or enrollee in the request for confidential communications.Section 7. Reporting requirements.(a) Information required.--Medical assistance or CHIP managed care plans and health insurers shall annually report to the department the number, type and disposition of each complaint, grievance, internal appeal and adverse benefit determination filed with the MA or CHIP managed care plan or health insurer regarding contraceptive care.(b) Inclusion in annual report.--The information received under subsection (a) shall be included in the annual reports submitted by the department under section 2181(f) of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the terms "adverse benefit determination," "complaint" and "grievance" shall have the meanings given to them in section 2102 of The Insurance Company Law of 1921.Section 8. Enforcement.(a) Penalties.--Upon satisfactory evidence of the violation of this act by an MA or CHIP managed care plan, health insurer or other person, subject to subsection (b), one or more of the following penalties may be imposed at the discretion of the Insurance Commissioner or the Department of Human Services, as appropriate:(1) Suspension or revocation of the license of the offending health insurer.20250HB1140PN1449 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Refusal, for a period not to exceed one year, to issue a new license to the offending health insurer.(3) A fine of not more than $5,000 for each violation of this act.(4) A fine of not more than $10,000 for each willful violation of this act.(b) Limitations.--(1) Fines imposed against an MA or CHIP managed care plan or health insurer under this act may not exceed $500,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(2) Fines imposed against any other person under this act may not exceed $100,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(c) Additional remedies.--The enforcement remedies imposed under this section are in addition to any other remedies or penalties that may be imposed under any other applicable law of this Commonwealth, including:(1) The act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act. A violation of this act shall be deemed to be an unfair method of competition and unfair or deceptive act or practice under that act.(2) The act of December 18, 1996 (P.L.1066, No.159), known as the Accident and Health Filing Reform Act.(3) The act of June 25, 1997 (P.L.295, No.29), known as the Pennsylvania Health Care Insurance Portability Act.(d) Administration.--(1) The provisions of this section shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies).(2) A party against whom penalties are assessed in an 20250HB1140PN1449 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administrative action under this section may appeal to Commonwealth Court as provided in 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 9. Regulations.(a) Department of Human Services.--The Department of Human Services may promulgate necessary and appropriate regulations with respect to MA or CHIP managed care plans to implement, administer and enforce this act.(b) Insurance Department.--The department may promulgate necessary and appropriate regulations with respect to health insurers and health insurance policies to implement, administer and enforce this act.Section 10. Applicability.This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the department, this act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the department, this act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 11. Severability.The provisions of this act are severable. If a provision of this act or the provision's application to a person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.20250HB1140PN1449 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 12. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1140PN1449 - 13 - 12